Utah statutes.
73-5a-303.   Circumstances under which the plan must be modified or the approval revoked.

(1)  If at any time during construction, enlargement, repair, alteration, or removal of a dam the state engineer finds that the conditions encountered differ appreciably from those assumed in the plan, he may require the plans to be modified.

(2)  If conditions are revealed which will not permit the construction of a safe dam, the state engineer shall revoke the approval.



Enacted by Chapter 319, 1990 General Session

